wandat.foma
### wandat.foma ###

# Vowels
define oV [ a | e | i | u ];
define nV [ a ̨ | e ̨ | o ̨ ];
define consonant [ t | k | ʔ | ⁿ d | ⁿ g | s | š | h | ž | m | n | r | w | y ];

define InitialHDeletion h -> 0 || .#. _ [ s | š ] ;
define InitialWDeletion w -> 0 || .#. _ a y ;

define GlottalStopElision ʔ -> 0 || _ "^" h ;

define SemiMeetsW t -> k || _ "^" w ;
define SemiMeetsConsonant t -> t e || _ "^" consonant ;

define AStemOverlap a -> 0 || [ u | o ̨ ] "^" _ ;

# Cleanup: remove morpheme boundaries
define Cleanup "^" -> 0;

read lexc wandat.lexc
define Lexicon;

define Grammar Lexicon .o.
               InitialHDeletion .o.
			   InitialWDeletion .o.
			   GlottalStopElision .o.
			   SemiMeetsW .o.
			   SemiMeetsConsonant .o.
			   AStemOverlap .o.
               Cleanup;

regex Grammar;
